Wyoming statutes. Title 26 Insurance Code
Chapter 27 Reciprocal Insurers

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

43 Am. Jur. 2d Insurance §§ 81 to 88.

46A C.J.S. Insurance §§ 1709 to 1730.

§ 26-27-101.
Definitions.

As used in this chapter:

“Attorney” means the attorney-in-fact of a reciprocal insurer and may be an individual, firm or corporation;

“Reciprocal insurance” means insurance resulting from an interexchange among persons, known as “subscribers”, of reciprocal agreements of indemnity, the interexchange being carried out through an “attorney-in-fact” common to all the persons;

“Reciprocal insurer” means an unincorporated aggregation of subscribers operating individually and collectively through an attorney-in-fact to provide reciprocal insurance among themselves.

History.

Laws 1967, ch. 136, §§ 558, 559, 563; W.S. 1957, §§ 26.1-558, 26.1-559, 26.1-563; W.S. 1977, §§

26-32-101

,

26-32-102

, 26-32-106; Laws 1983, ch. 190, § 1.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

§ 26-27-102.
Scope and applicability of chapter; existing insurers.

All authorized reciprocal insurers are governed by those sections of this chapter not expressly made applicable to domestic reciprocals.

Authorized reciprocal insurers shall:

Comply with this chapter;

Make any amendments to their subscribers’ agreement, power of attorney policies and other documents and accounts not consistent with this chapter; and

Perform any other acts required for compliance.

History.

Laws 1967, ch. 136, § 560; W.S. 1957, § 26.1-560; W.S. 1977, §

26-32-103

; Laws 1983, ch. 190, § 1.

§ 26-27-103.
Insuring powers.

A reciprocal insurer, upon qualifying therefor as provided by this code [title 26], may transact any kind of insurance defined by this code, other than life or title insurances.

A reciprocal insurer may purchase reinsurance upon the risk of any subscriber and may grant reinsurance as to any kind of insurance it is authorized to transact directly.

History.

Laws 1967, ch. 136, § 561; W.S. 1957, § 26.1-561; W.S. 1977, § 26-32-104; Laws 1983, ch. 190, § 1.

Cross references. —

For provisions as to kinds of insurance, see §§

26-5-101

through

26-5-111

.

§ 26-27-104.
Name; power to sue or be sued.

A reciprocal insurer shall:

Have and use a business name, which shall include the word “reciprocal”, “interinsurer”, “interinsurance”, “exchange”, “underwriters”, “underwriting” or “association”;

Sue and be sued in its own name.

History.

Laws 1967, ch. 136, § 562; W.S. 1957, § 26.1-562; W.S. 1977, § 26-32-105; Laws 1983, ch. 190, § 1.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

§ 26-27-105.
Attorney deemed not doing business in state; subscribers and attorney comprise single entity.

The attorney of a foreign or alien reciprocal insurer, which insurer is authorized to transact insurance in this state, is not, by virtue of discharge of its duties as attorney with respect to the insurer’s transactions in this state, considered to be doing business in this state within the meaning of any laws of this state applying to foreign persons, firms or corporations.

The subscribers and the attorney-in-fact comprise a reciprocal insurer and a single entity for the purposes of chapter 4 of this code [title 26] as to all operations under the insurer’s certificate of authority.

History.

Laws 1967, ch. 136, § 563; W.S. 1957, § 26.1-563; W.S. 1977, § 26-32-106; Laws 1983, ch. 190, § 1.

§ 26-27-106.
Surplus funds required.

A domestic reciprocal insurer formed under this chapter, if it has otherwise complied with the applicable provisions of this code [title 26], may be authorized to transact insurance if it has and maintains surplus funds as follows:

To transact property insurance, surplus funds of not less than three hundred thousand dollars ($300,000.00);

To transact casualty insurance, other than worker’s compensation, surplus funds of not less than three hundred thousand dollars ($300,000.00);

To transact multiple lines insurance, surplus funds of not less than six hundred thousand dollars ($600,000.00).

In addition to surplus required to be maintained under subsection (a) of this section, the insurer, when first authorized, shall have expendable surplus equal to not less than one-half (1/2) of the minimum amount of surplus required to be maintained.

A domestic reciprocal insurer may be authorized to transact additional kinds of insurance if it has otherwise complied with the provisions of this code therefor and possesses and maintains surplus funds in an amount equal to the minimum capital stock and surplus required to be maintained by a stock insurer for authority to transact a like combination of kinds of insurance.

History.

Laws 1967, ch. 136, § 564; W.S. 1957, § 26.1-564; W.S. 1977, § 26-32-107; Laws 1983, ch. 190, § 1.

§ 26-27-107.
Organization; declaration.

Twenty-five (25) or more persons domiciled in this state may organize a domestic reciprocal insurer and apply to the commissioner for a certificate of authority to transact insurance.

The proposed attorney shall fulfill the requirements of and shall execute and file with the commissioner when applying for a certificate of authority, a declaration setting forth:

The insurer’s name;

The location of the insurer’s principal office, which shall be the same as that of the attorney and shall be maintained within this state;

The kinds of insurance proposed to be transacted;

The names and addresses of the original subscribers;

The designation and appointment of the proposed attorney and a copy of the power of attorney;

The names and addresses of the officers and directors of the attorney, if a corporation, or its members, if a firm;

The powers of the subscribers’ advisory committee and the names and terms of office of the committee members;

That all monies paid to the reciprocal, after deducting therefrom any sum payable to the attorney, shall be held in the insurer’s name and for the purposes specified in the subscribers’ agreement;

A copy of the subscribers’ agreement;

A statement that each of the original subscribers has in good faith applied for insurance of a kind proposed to be transacted, and that the insurer has received from each such subscriber the full premium or premium deposit required for the policy applied for, for a term of not less than six (6) months at an adequate rate previously filed with and approved by the commissioner;

A statement of the insurer’s financial condition, a schedule of its assets and a statement that the surplus required by W.S.

26-27-106

is on hand; and

A copy of each policy, endorsement and application form it then proposes to issue or use.

The declaration specified in subsection (b) of this section shall be acknowledged by the attorney in the manner required for the acknowledgment of deeds.

History.

Laws 1967, ch. 136, § 565; W.S. 1957, § 26.1-565; W.S. 1977, § 26-32-108; Laws 1983, ch. 190, § 1.

§ 26-27-108.
Certificate of authority generally.

A reciprocal insurer’s certificate of authority shall be issued to its attorney in the insurer’s name.

The commissioner may refuse, suspend or revoke the certificate of authority, in addition to other grounds therefor, for failure of the attorney to comply with any provision of this code [title 26].

History.

Laws 1967, ch. 136, § 566; W.S. 1957, § 26.1-566; W.S. 1977, § 26-32-109; Laws 1983, ch. 190, § 1.

Quoted

in

Armed Forces Coop. Insuring Ass'n v. Department of Ins., 622 P.2d 1318,

1980 Wyo. LEXIS 332

(Wyo. 1980).

§ 26-27-109.
Power of attorney.

The rights and powers of a reciprocal insurer’s attorney are as provided in the power of attorney given it by the subscribers.

The power of attorney shall set forth:

That the attorney is empowered to accept service of process on behalf of the insurer in actions against the insurer upon contracts exchanged;

The powers of the attorney;

The general services to be performed by the attorney;

The maximum amount to be deducted from advance premiums or deposits to be paid to the attorney and the general items of expense, in addition to losses, to be paid by the insurer; and

Except as to nonassessable policies, a provision for a contingent several liability of each subscriber in a specified amount, which shall not be less than one (1) nor more than ten (10) times the premium deposit stated in the policy.

The power of attorney may:

Provide for the right of substitution of the attorney and revocation of the power of attorney and rights thereunder;

Impose any restrictions upon the exercise of the power as are agreed upon by the subscribers;

Provide for the exercise of any right reserved to the subscribers directly or through their advisory committee; and

Contain any other lawful provisions deemed advisable.

The terms of any power of attorney or agreement collateral thereto shall be reasonable and equitable, and no power or agreement shall be used or be effective in this state until approved by the commissioner.

History.

Laws 1967, ch. 136, § 567; W.S. 1957, § 26.1-567; W.S. 1977, § 26-32-110; Laws 1983, ch. 190, § 1.

§ 26-27-110.
Modifications of subscribers' agreement or power of attorney.

Modifications of the terms of the subscribers’ agreement or of the power of attorney of a domestic reciprocal insurer shall be made jointly by the attorney and the subscribers’ advisory committee. No modification is effective retroactively, nor does any modification affect any insurance contract issued prior to the modification.

History.

Laws 1967, ch. 136, § 568; W.S. 1957, § 26.1-568; W.S. 1977, § 26-32-111; Laws 1983, ch. 190, § 1.

§ 26-27-111.
Attorney's bond; generally.

Concurrently with the filing of the declaration provided for in W.S.

26-27-107

, the attorney of a domestic reciprocal insurer shall file with the commissioner a bond in favor of this state for the benefit of all persons damaged as a result of breach by the attorney of the conditions of his bond as set forth in subsection (b) of this section. The bond shall be executed by the attorney and by an authorized corporate surety, subject to the commissioner’s approval.

The bond shall be in the penal sum of twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000.00), aggregate in form, conditioned that the attorney will faithfully account for all the insurer’s monies and other property coming into his hands and that he will not withdraw or appropriate to his own use from the insurer’s funds, any monies or property to which he is not entitled under the power of attorney.

The bond shall provide that it is not subject to cancellation unless thirty (30) days advance notice in writing of cancellation is given both the attorney and the commissioner.

History.

Laws 1967, ch. 136, § 569; W.S. 1957, § 26.1-569; W.S. 1977, § 26-32-112; Laws 1983, ch. 190, § 1.

§ 26-27-112.
Attorney's bond; deposit instead of bond.

Instead of the bond required under W.S.

26-27-111

, the attorney may maintain on deposit through the office of the commissioner, a like amount in cash or in value of securities qualified under this code [title 26] as insurers’ investments and subject to the same conditions as the bond.

History.

Laws 1967, ch. 136, § 570; W.S. 1957, § 26.1-570; W.S. 1977, § 26-32-113; Laws 1983, ch. 190, § 1.

Cross references. —

For provisions as to investments, see §§

26-7-101

through

26-7-116

.

§ 26-27-113.
Attorney's bond; action on bond; deposit of amounts recovered; total aggregate liability.

Action on the attorney’s bond or to recover against any deposit made instead of a bond may be brought at any time by one (1) or more subscribers suffering loss through a violation of its conditions, or by a receiver or liquidator of the insurer. Amounts recovered on the bond shall be deposited in and become part of the insurer’s funds. The total aggregate liability of the surety is limited to the amount of the bond’s penalty.

History.

Laws 1967, ch. 136, § 571; W.S. 1957, § 26.1-571; W.S. 1977, § 26-32-114; Laws 1983, ch. 190, § 1.

§ 26-27-114.
Service of process; judgments.

Legal process shall be served upon a domestic reciprocal insurer by serving the insurer’s attorney at his principal offices or by serving the commissioner as the insurer’s process agent under W.S.

26-3-121

and

26-3-122

.

Any judgment based upon legal process so served is binding upon each of the insurer’s subscribers as their individual interests may appear, but in an amount not exceeding their individual contingent liabilities, if any, the same as though personal service of process was had upon each subscriber.

History.

Laws 1967, ch. 136, § 572; W.S. 1957, § 26.1-572; W.S. 1977, § 26-32-115; Laws 1983, ch. 190, § 1.

§ 26-27-115.
Advances to insurer.

The attorney or other parties may advance to a domestic reciprocal insurer upon reasonable terms any funds it requires in its operations. Any advanced funds shall not be treated as a liability of the insurer, and, except upon liquidation of the insurer, shall not be withdrawn or repaid except out of the insurer’s realized earned surplus in excess of its minimum required surplus. No withdrawal or repayment shall be made without the commissioner’s advance approval. This section does not apply to bank loans or to other loans made upon security.

History.

Laws 1967, ch. 136, § 573; W.S. 1957, § 26.1-573; W.S. 1977, § 26-32-116; Laws 1983, ch. 190, § 1.

§ 26-27-116.
Annual statement.

A reciprocal insurer’s annual statement shall be made and filed by its attorney.

The statement shall be supplemented by any information the commissioner requires relative to the attorney’s affairs and transactions.

History.

Laws 1967, ch. 136, § 574; W.S. 1957, § 26.1-574; W.S. 1977, § 26-32-117; Laws 1983, ch. 190, § 1.

§ 26-27-117.
Determining financial condition of reciprocal insurer.

In determining the financial condition of a reciprocal insurer the commissioner shall apply the rules set forth in the most recent National Association of Insurance Commissioners’ accounting practices and procedures manual.

through (vii) Repealed by Laws 2001, ch. 9, § 2.

History.

Laws 1967, ch. 136, § 575; W.S. 1957, § 26.1-575; W.S. 1977, § 26-32-118; Laws 1983, ch. 190, § 1; 2001, ch. 9, §§ 1, 2.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

§ 26-27-118.
Who may be subscribers.

Individuals, partnerships and corporations of this state may apply, enter into agreement for and hold policies or contracts in or with and be a subscriber of any domestic, foreign or alien reciprocal insurer. Any corporation organized under the laws of this state, in addition to the rights, powers, and franchises specified in its articles of incorporation, may exchange insurance contracts through the reciprocal insurer. The right to exchange the contracts is incidental to the purposes for which the corporations are organized and is as fully granted as the rights and powers expressly conferred upon those corporations.

Any governmental entity, board, association, estate, trustee or fiduciary is authorized to exchange nonassessable reciprocal interinsurance contracts with any other governmental entity, board, association, estate, trustee or fiduciary and with individuals, partnerships and corporations to the same extent that individuals, partnerships and corporations are authorized to exchange reciprocal interinsurance contracts. Any officer, representative, trustee, receiver, or legal representative of any subscriber specified in this subsection is recognized as acting for or on its behalf for the purpose of the contract but is not personally liable upon the contract by reason of acting in that representative capacity.

History.

Laws 1967, ch. 136, § 576; W.S. 1957, § 26.1-576; W.S. 1977, § 26-32-119; Laws 1983, ch. 190, § 1.

§ 26-27-119.
Subscribers' advisory committee.

The advisory committee of a domestic reciprocal insurer exercising the subscribers’ rights shall be selected under any rules the subscribers adopt.

Not less than two-thirds (2/3) of the committee shall be subscribers other than the attorney, or any person employed by, representing or having a financial interest in the attorney.

The committee shall:

Supervise the insurer’s finances;

Supervise the insurer’s operations to the extent to assure conformity with the subscribers’ agreement and power of attorney;

Procure the audit of the insurer’s and the attorney’s accounts and records at the insurer’s expense; and

Have any additional powers and functions as the subscribers’ agreement confers.

History.

Laws 1967, ch. 136, § 577; W.S. 1957, § 26.1-577; W.S. 1977, § 26-32-120; Laws 1983, ch. 190, § 1.

§ 26-27-120.
Subscribers' liability; generally.

Except as to a nonassessable policy, the liability of each subscriber for the reciprocal insurer’s obligations is an individual, several and proportionate liability and not a joint liability.

Except as to a nonassessable policy, each subscriber has a contingent assessment liability in the amount provided for in the power of attorney or in the subscribers’ agreement, for payment of actual losses and expenses incurred while his policy is in force. The contingent liability may be at the rate of not less than one (1) nor more than ten (10) times the premium or premium deposit stated in the policy, and the maximum aggregate contingent liability shall be computed in the manner set forth in W.S.

26-27-124

.

Each assessable policy the insurer issues shall contain a statement of the contingent liability, set in type of the same prominence as the insuring clause.

History.

Laws 1967, ch. 136, § 578; W.S. 1957, § 26.1-578; W.S. 1977, § 26-32-121; Laws 1983, ch. 190, § 1.

Law reviews. —

For comment, “Wyoming Tort Reform and the Medical Malpractice Insurance Crisis: A Second Opinion,” see XXVIII Land & Water L. Rev. 593 (1993).

§ 26-27-121.
Subscribers' liability; liability upon judgment.

No action shall lie against any subscriber upon any obligation claimed against the insurer until a final judgment is obtained against the insurer and remains unsatisfied for thirty (30) days.

Any judgment specified in this section is binding upon each subscriber only in the proportion as his interests appear and in an amount not exceeding his contingent liability, if any.

History.

Laws 1967, ch. 136, § 579; W.S. 1957, § 26.1-579; W.S. 1977, § 26-32-122; Laws 1983, ch. 190, § 1.

§ 26-27-122.
Assessment of subscribers.

Upon advance approval by the subscribers’ advisory committee and the commissioner, the attorney may levy assessments upon subscribers of a domestic reciprocal insurer liable therefor under the terms of their policies. The commissioner may also levy assessments upon subscribers in liquidation of the insurer.

Each subscriber’s share of a deficiency for which an assessment is made, but not exceeding in any case his aggregate contingent liability as computed in accordance with W.S.

26-27-124

, shall be computed by applying to the premium earned on the subscriber’s policy or policies during the period to be covered by the assessment, the ratio of the total deficiency to the total premiums earned during that period upon all policies subject to the assessment.

In computing the earned premiums for the purposes of this section, the gross premium the insurer receives for the policy shall be used as a base, deducting therefrom solely charges not recurring upon the policy renewal or extension.

No subscriber shall have an offset against any assessment for which he is liable, because of any claim for unearned premium or losses payable.

History.

Laws 1967, ch. 136, § 580; W.S. 1957, § 26.1-580; W.S. 1977, § 26-32-123; Laws 1983, ch. 190, § 1.

§ 26-27-123.
Time limit for assessments.

Each subscriber of a domestic reciprocal insurer having contingent liability is liable for and shall pay his share of any assessment, as computed and limited in accordance with this chapter, if:

While his policy is in force or within one (1) year after its termination, he is notified by either the attorney or the commissioner of his intentions to levy an assessment; or

An order to show cause why a receiver, conservator, rehabilitator or liquidator of the insurer should not be appointed is issued while his policy is in force or within one (1) year after its termination.

History.

Laws 1967, ch. 136, § 581; W.S. 1957, § 26.1-581; W.S. 1977, § 26-32-124; Laws 1983, ch. 190, § 1.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

§ 26-27-124.
Aggregate liability.

No one (1) policy or subscriber as to that policy shall be assessed or charged with an aggregate of contingent liability, as to obligations incurred by a domestic reciprocal insurer in any one (1) calendar year, in excess of the amount provided for in the power of attorney or in the subscribers’ agreement, computed solely upon premium earned on that policy during that year.

History.

Laws 1967, ch. 136, § 582; W.S. 1957, 26.1-582; W.S. 1977, § 26-32-125; Laws 1983, ch. 190, § 1.

§ 26-27-125.
Nonassessable policies.

If a reciprocal insurer has a surplus of assets over all liabilities at least equal to the minimum capital stock and surplus required to be maintained by a domestic stock insurer authorized to transact like kinds of insurance, upon application of the attorney and as approved by the subscribers’ advisory committee, the commissioner shall issue his certificate authorizing the insurer to extinguish the contingent liability of subscribers under its policies then in force in this state and to omit provisions imposing contingent liability in all policies delivered or issued for delivery in this state for as long as all the surplus remains unimpaired.

If the surplus is impaired, the commissioner shall immediately revoke the certificate. The revocation does not render subject to contingent liability any policy then in force and for the remainder of the period for which the premium has been paid. After revocation no policy shall be issued or renewed without providing for the subscriber’s contingent assessment liability.

The commissioner shall not authorize a domestic reciprocal insurer to extinguish the contingent liability of any of its subscribers or in any of its policies to be issued, unless it qualifies to and does extinguish the liability of all its subscribers and in all the policies for all kinds of insurance it transacts. If required by the laws of another state in which the insurer is transacting insurance as an authorized insurer, the insurer may issue policies providing for the contingent liability of those of its subscribers as acquire the policies in that state, and need not extinguish the contingent liability applicable to policies previously in force in that state.

History.

Laws 1967, ch. 136, § 583; W.S. 1957, § 26.1-583; W.S. 1977, § 26-32-126; Laws 1983, ch. 190, § 1.

§ 26-27-126.
Distribution of savings.

A reciprocal insurer may return to its subscribers any unused premiums, savings or credits accruing to their accounts. Any such distribution shall not unfairly discriminate between classes of risks, or policies, or between subscribers, but this does not prevent retrospective rating, nor distribution on a retrospective plan.

History.

Laws 1967, ch. 136, § 584; W.S. 1957, § 26.1-584; W.S. 1977, § 26-32-127; Laws 1983, ch. 190, § 1.

§ 26-27-127.
Distribution of subscribers' share of assets upon liquidation.

Upon the liquidation of a domestic reciprocal insurer, its assets remaining after discharge of its indebtedness and policy obligations, the return of any contributions of the attorney or other persons to its surplus made as provided in W.S.

26-27-115

, and the return of any unused premium, savings or credits then standing on subscribers’ accounts, shall be distributed to its subscribers who were subscribers within the twelve (12) months immediately prior to the last termination of its certificates of authority, according to any reasonable formula the commissioner approves.

History.

Laws 1967, ch. 136, § 585; W.S. 1957, § 26.1-585; W.S. 1977, § 26-32-128; Laws 1983, ch. 190, § 1.

§ 26-27-128.
Merger or conversion.

A domestic reciprocal insurer may merge with another reciprocal insurer or be converted to a stock or mutual insurer, upon affirmative vote of not less than two-thirds (2/3) of its subscribers who vote on the question pursuant to proper notice and the commissioner’s approval of the merger terms.

Any stock or mutual insurer specified in subsection (a) of this section is subject to the same capital or surplus requirements and has the same rights as a like domestic insurer transacting like kinds of insurance.

The commissioner shall not approve any plan for merger or conversion which is inequitable to subscribers, or which, if for conversion to a stock insurer, does not give each subscriber preferential right to acquire stock of the proposed insurer proportionate to his interest in the reciprocal insurer as determined in accordance with W.S.

26-27-127

and a reasonable length of time within which to exercise that right.

History.

Laws 1967, ch. 136, § 586; W.S. 1957, § 26.1-586; W.S. 1977, § 26-32-129; Laws 1983, ch. 190, § 1.

§ 26-27-129.
Impaired reciprocals; liquidation.

If a reciprocal insurer’s assets are at any time insufficient to discharge its liabilities, other than any liability because of funds contributed by the attorney or others, and to maintain the required surplus, its attorney shall immediately make up the deficiency or levy an assessment upon the subscribers for the amount needed to make up the deficiency, subject to the limitation set forth in the power of attorney or policy.

If the attorney fails to make up the deficiency or to make the assessment within thirty (30) days after the commissioner orders him to do so, or if the deficiency is not fully made up within sixty (60) days after the date the assessment is made, the insurer is deemed insolvent and shall be proceeded against as authorized by this code [title 26].

If an insurer’s liquidation is ordered, an assessment shall be levied upon the subscribers in an amount, subject to limits as provided by this chapter, the commissioner determines to be necessary to discharge all the insurer’s liabilities, exclusive of any funds contributed by the attorney or other persons, but including the reasonable liquidation cost.

History.

Laws 1967, ch. 136, § 587; W.S. 1957, § 26.1-587; W.S. 1977, § 26-32-130; Laws 1983, ch. 190, § 1.